Hawaii statutes.
[§489D-2] Purpose. It is the intent of
the legislature to establish within the State a licensure system to ensure the
safe and sound operation of money transmission businesses, to ensure that these
businesses are not used for criminal purposes, to promote confidence in the
State's financial system, and to protect the public interest. [L 2006, c 153,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next